Utah statutes.
53-2a-811.   Disputes.

Except for factual disputes concerning the office of governor, the governor shall adjudicate any dispute concerning a question of fact arising under this part concerning a state officer.  The governor's decision is final.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

